Hawaii statutes.
[§340B-10] Criminal penalties. Any
individual who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or
certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed
or required to be maintained under this chapter, or by any rule or regulation
adopted under this chapter shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor. [L 1978, c
169, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next